Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1551 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma Money
Transmission Modernization Act”.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1552 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act replaces
existing state money transmission laws. It is the intent of the
Legislature that the provisions of this act accomplish the
following:
1. Ensure states can coordinate in all areas of regulation,
licensing, and supervision to eliminate unnecessary regulatory
burden and more effectively utilize regulator resources;
2. Protect the public from financial crime;
3. Standardize the types of activities that are subject to
licensing or otherwise exempt from licensing; and
4. Modernize safety and soundness requirements to ensure
customer funds are protected in an environment that supports
innovative and competitive business practices.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1553 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 6

1. “Acting in concert” means persons knowingly acting together
with a common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee
whether or not pursuant to an express agreement;
2. “Authorized delegate” means any person a licensee designates
to engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
3. “Average daily money transmission liability” means the
amount of the licensee’s outstanding money transmission obligations
in Oklahoma at the end of each day in a given period of time, added
together, and divided by the total number of days in the given
period of time. For purposes of calculating average daily money
transmission liability under this act for any licensee required to
do so, the given period of time shall be the quarters ending March
31, June 30, September 30, and December 31;
4. “Bank Secrecy Act” means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C.,
Section 5311 et seq. and its implementing regulations, as amended
and recodified from time to time;
5. “Closed loop stored value” means stored value that is
redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided by the
issuer or its affiliate or franchisees of the issuer or its
affiliate, except to the extent required by applicable law to be
redeemable in cash for its cash value;
6. “Commissioner” means the State Banking Commissioner of the
Oklahoma State Banking Department as provided for in subsection B of
Section 201 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes or a person
designated by the Commissioner and acting under the Commissioner’s
direction and authority;
7. a. “Control” means a controlling influence as determined
by the Commissioner, or the power to:
(1) directly or indirectly vote at least twenty-five
percent (25%) of the outstanding voting shares or
voting interests of a licensee or person in
control of a licensee,
(2) elect or appoint a majority of key individuals or
executive officers, managers, directors,
trustees, or other persons exercising managerial
authority over a person in control of a licensee,
or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 7

(3) directly or indirectly exercise a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a
licensee or person in control of a licensee.
b. A person is presumed to exercise a controlling
influence when the person holds the power to vote,
directly or indirectly, at least ten percent (10%) of
the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a
licensee or person in control of a licensee. The
presumption of control defined by this subparagraph
may be rebutted by evidence that the person who is
presumed to exercise a controlling influence is a
passive investor.
c. For purposes of determining the percentage of a person
controlled by any other person, the person’s interest
shall be aggregated with the interest of any other
immediate family member, including the person’s
spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers- and
fathers-in-law, sons- and daughters-in-law, brothers-
and sisters-in-law, and any other person who shares
such person’s home.
d. The Commissioner shall have broad authority to
designate a person as someone who has controlling
influence if the person owns voting shares of a
licensee or if the person acts on behalf of someone
who owns voting shares of a licensee. A determination
made by the Commissioner under this paragraph is not
rebuttable;
8. “Currency” means the coin and paper money issued by the
United States or another country that is designated as legal tender,
circulates, and is customarily used and accepted as a medium of
exchange in the country of issuance;
9. “Department” means the Oklahoma State Banking Department;
10. “Digital asset” means the same as defined in Section 1520
of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. “Digital asset kiosk” means the same as defined in Section
1520 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 8

12. “Digital asset kiosk operator” means the same as defined in
Section 1520 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. “Eligible rating” means a sufficiently high credit rating
given by an eligible rating service. If a security has differing
credit ratings given by multiple eligible rating services, the
highest rating shall apply when determining whether the security has
an eligible rating. For purposes of this definition, a sufficiently
high credit rating is a credit rating of any of the three highest
rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, including:
a. a long-term credit rating of A- or higher by S&P
Global Ratings,
b. a short-term credit rating of A-2, SP-2, or higher by
S&P Global Ratings, or
c. the relative equivalent rating from an eligible
rating service that does not have a rating described
by subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph;
14. “Eligible rating service” means any nationally recognized
statistical rating organization as defined by the United States
Securities and Exchange Commission, and any other organization
designated by the Commissioner by rule or order;
15. “Federally insured depository financial institution” means
a bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company,
savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial
loan company organized under the laws of the United States, or any
state of the United States, when such bank, credit union, savings
and loan association, trust company, savings association, savings
bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company has federally
insured deposits;
16. “In this state” means:
a. for a transaction requested in person, a physical
location within this state, or
b. for a transaction requested electronically or by
phone, a determination that the person requesting the
transaction is in this state based on:
(1) information provided by the person regarding:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 9

(a) if the person is an individual, the
location of the individual’s residential
address, or
(b) if the person is a business entity, the
entity’s principal place of business or
other physical address location, and
(2) any records associated with the person that the
provider of the money transmission has that
indicate the person’s location, including an
address associated with the person’s account;
17. “Individual” means a natural person;
18. “Key individual” means any individual ultimately
responsible for establishing or directing policies and procedures of
the licensee, such as an executive officer, manager, director, or
trustee;
19. “Licensee” means a person licensed under the Oklahoma Money
Transmission Modernization Act;
20. “Material litigation” means litigation that, according to
United States generally accepted accounting principles, is
significant to a person’s financial health and would be required to
be disclosed in the person’s annual audited financial statements,
report to shareholders, or similar records;
21. “Money” or “monetary value” means currency or a claim that
can be converted into currency through a financial institution,
electronic payments network, or other formal or informal payment
system. The term includes stablecoin that:
a. is pegged to a sovereign currency,
b. is fully backed by assets held in reserve, and
c. grants a holder of the stablecoin the right to redeem
the stablecoin for sovereign currency from the
issuer;
22. “Money transmission” means any of the following:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 10

a. selling or issuing payment instruments to a person
located in this state,
b. selling or issuing stored value to a person located
in this state,
c. receiving money for transmission from a person
located in this state, and
d. payroll processing services.
Money transmission does not mean the provision of solely online
or telecommunications services or network access;
23. “MSB accredited state” means a state agency that is
accredited by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money
Transmitter Regulators Association for money transmission licensing
and supervision;
24. “Multistate licensing process” means any agreement entered
into by and among state regulators relating to coordinated
processing of applications for money transmission licenses,
applications for the acquisition of control of a licensee, control
determinations, or notice and information requirements for a change
of key individuals;
25. “NMLS” means the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and
Registry developed by the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and
the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators and
owned and operated by the State Regulatory Registry, LLC, or any
successor or affiliated entity, for the licensing and registration
of persons in financial services industries;
26. “Outstanding money transmission obligations” shall be
established and extinguished in accordance with applicable state law
and shall mean:
a. any payment instrument or stored value:
(1) that has been:
(a) issued or sold by a money transmission
licensee to a person located in any state,
territory, or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia, the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 11

Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a United
States military installation that is located
in a foreign country, or
(b) reported as sold by an authorized delegate
to a person who is located in any state,
territory, or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia, the
Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a United
States military installation that is located
in a foreign country, and
(2) that has not been:
(a) paid or refunded by or for the licensee, or
(b) escheated in accordance with applicable
abandoned property laws, or
b. money received for money transmission services by a
money transmission licensee or an authorized delegate
from a person located in any state, territory, or
possession of the United States, the District of
Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a United
States military installation that is located in a
foreign country that has not been:
(1) received by the payee or refunded to the person,
or
(2) escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned
property laws;
27. “Passive investor” means a person who:
a. does not have the power to elect a majority of key
individuals or executive officers, managers,
directors, trustees, or other persons exercising
managerial authority of a person in control of a
licensee,
b. is not employed by and does not have any managerial
duties of the licensee or person in control of a
licensee,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 12

c. does not have the power to exercise, directly or
indirectly, a controlling influence over the
management or policies of a licensee or person in
control of a licensee, and
d. either:
(1) attests to subparagraphs a, b, and c of this
paragraph, in a form and medium prescribed by the
Commissioner, or
(2) commits to subparagraphs a, b, and c of this
paragraph in a written document;
28. “Payment instrument” means a written or electronic check,
draft, money order, traveler’s check, or other written or electronic
instrument for the transmission or payment of money or monetary
value, whether or not negotiable. The term does not include stored
value or any instrument that is:
a. redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services
provided by the issuer or its affiliate or
franchisees of the issuer or its affiliate, except to
the extent required by applicable law to be
redeemable in cash for its cash value, or
b. not sold to the public but issued and distributed as
part of a loyalty, rewards, or promotional program;
29. “Payroll processing services” means receiving money for
transmission pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages
or salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and federal
agencies, make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make
distributions of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries.
The term payroll processing services does not include an employer
performing payroll processing services on its own behalf or on
behalf of its affiliate, or a professional employer organization
subject to regulation under other applicable state law;
30. “Person” means any individual, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust,
association, joint stock corporation, or other corporate entity
identified by the Commissioner;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 13

31. “Receiving money for transmission” or “money received for
transmission” means receiving money or monetary value in the United
States for transmission within or outside the United States by
electronic or other means;
32. “Stored value” means monetary value representing a claim
against the issuer evidenced by an electronic or digital record and
that is intended and accepted for use as a means of redemption for
money or monetary value or payment for goods or services. The term
includes, but is not limited to, “prepaid access” as defined by 31
C.F.R., Section 1010.100, as amended. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, the term stored value does not include a payment
instrument or closed loop stored value, or stored value not sold to
the public but issued and distributed as part of a loyalty, rewards,
or promotional program; and
33. “Tangible net worth” means the aggregate assets of a
licensee excluding all intangible assets, less liabilities, as
determined in accordance with United States generally accepted
accounting principles.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1554 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act shall not
apply to:
1. An operator of a payment system to the extent that it
provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or
among persons exempted by this section or licensees, in connection
with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card
transactions, stored-value transactions, automated clearing house
transfers, or similar funds transfers;
2. A person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and
process a payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services,
other than money transmission itself, provided to the payor by the
payee, provided that:
a. there exists a written agreement between the payee
and the agent directing the agent to collect and
process payments from payors on the payee’s behalf,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 14

b. the payee holds the agent out to the public as
accepting payments for goods or services on the
payee’s behalf, and
c. payment for the goods or services is treated as
received by the payee upon receipt by the agent so
that the payor’s obligation is extinguished and there
is no risk of loss to the payor if the agent fails to
remit the funds to the payee;
3. A person that acts as an intermediary by processing payments
between an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money
transmission obligation to a sender, and the sender’s designated
recipient, provided that the entity:
a. is properly licensed or exempt from licensing
requirements under this act,
b. provides a receipt, electronic record, or other
written confirmation to the sender identifying the
entity as the provider of money transmission in the
transaction, and
c. bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding
money transmission obligation to the sender,
including the obligation to make the sender whole in
connection with any failure to transmit the funds to
the sender’s designated recipient;
4. The United States or a department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof, or its agent;
5. Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by
an agent of the United States Postal Service;
6. A state, county, city, or any other governmental agency or
governmental subdivision or instrumentality of a state, or its
agent;
7. A federally insured depository financial institution, bank
holding company, office of an international banking corporation,
foreign bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant to the
International Banking Act of 1978, 12 U.S.C., Section 3101 et seq.,
as amended, corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service
Company Act, 12 U.S.C., Sections 1861 through 1867, as amended, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 15

corporation organized under the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C., Sections 611
through 633, as amended;
8. Electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a
federal, state, county, or governmental agency by a contractor on
behalf of the United States or a department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof, or on behalf of a state or governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof;
9. A board of trade designated as a contract market under the
Commodity Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C., Sections 1 through 25, as amended,
or a person that, in the ordinary course of business, provides
clearance and settlement services for a board of trade to the extent
of its operation as or for such a board;
10. A registered futures commission merchant under the federal
commodities laws to the extent of its operation as such a merchant;
11. A person registered as a securities broker-dealer under
federal or state securities laws to the extent of its operation as
such a broker-dealer;
12. An individual employed by a licensee, authorized delegate,
or any person exempted from the licensing requirements of this act
when acting within the scope of employment and under the supervision
of the licensee, authorized delegate, or exempted person as an
employee and not as an independent contractor;
13. A person expressly appointed as a third-party service
provider to or agent of an entity exempt under paragraph 7 of this
section, solely to the extent that:
a. such service provider or agent is engaging in money
transmission on behalf of and pursuant to a written
agreement with the exempt entity that sets forth the
specific functions that the service provider or agent
is to perform, and
b. the exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and all
legal responsibility for satisfying the outstanding
money transmission obligations owed to purchasers and
holders of the outstanding money transmission
obligations upon receipt of the purchaser’s or
holder’s money or monetary value by the service
provider or agent; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 16

14. A person exempt by regulation or order if the Commissioner
finds such exemption to be in the public interest and that the
regulation of such person is not necessary for the purposes of this
act.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1555 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Commissioner may require any person claiming to be exempt
from licensing pursuant to Section 4 of this act to provide
information and documentation to the Commissioner demonstrating that
it qualifies for any claimed exemption.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1556 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In order to carry out the purposes of the Oklahoma Money
Transmission Modernization Act, the Commissioner may, subject to the
provisions of subsections A and B of Section 7 of this act:
1. Enter into agreements or relationships with other government
officials or federal and state regulatory agencies and regulatory
associations to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by
standardizing methods or procedures and sharing resources, records,
or related information obtained under this act;
2. Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods,
or software to examine or investigate any person subject to this
act;
3. Accept from other state or federal government agencies or
officials licensing, examination, or investigation reports created
by such other state or federal government agencies or officials; and
4. Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public
accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant
or licensee and incorporate the audit report into any report of
examination or investigation.
B. The Commissioner shall have broad administrative authority
to:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 17

1. Administer, interpret, and enforce this act;
2. Promulgate rules implementing this act; and
3. Recover the cost of administering and enforcing this act by
imposing and collecting proportionate and equitable fees and costs
associated with applications, examinations, investigations, and
other actions required for the purposes of this act.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1557 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as otherwise provided in subsection B of this
section, all information or reports obtained by the Commissioner
from an applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate, and all
information contained in or related to an examination,
investigation, operating report, or condition report prepared by, on
behalf of, or for the use of the Commissioner, or financial
statements, balance sheets, or authorized delegate information, are
confidential and are not subject to disclosure under the Oklahoma
Open Records Act.
B. The Commissioner may disclose information not otherwise
subject to disclosure under subsection A of this section to
representatives of state or federal agencies who agree in a record
that they will maintain the confidentiality of the information or
where the Commissioner finds that the release is reasonably
necessary for the protection and interest of the public in
accordance with the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
C. This section shall not prohibit the Commissioner from
disclosing to the public a list of all licensees or the aggregated
financial or transactional data concerning those licensees.
D. Information contained in the records of the Department that
is not confidential and may be made available to the public either
on the Department’s website, upon receipt by the Department of a
written request, or in the NMLS shall include:
1. The name, business address, telephone number, and unique
identifier of a licensee;
2. The business address of a licensee’s registered agent for
service;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 18

3. The name, business address, and telephone number of all
authorized delegates;
4. The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee,
provided that confidential information, including, but not limited
to, prices and fees for such bond is redacted;
5. Copies of any nonconfidential final orders of the Department
relating to any violation of this act or regulations promulgated
pursuant to this act; and
6. Notice of the imposition of an administrative fine or
penalty under this act.
SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1558 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commissioner may conduct investigations in or outside
this state and the United States as the Commissioner considers
necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce the Oklahoma
Money Transmission Modernization Act.
B. For purposes of an investigation, examination, or other
proceeding under this act, the Commissioner may:
1. Administer oaths or cause oaths to be administered;
2. Subpoena witnesses;
3. Compel the attendance of witnesses;
4. Take evidence; and
5. Require the production of any document that the Commissioner
determines to be relevant to the inquiry.
C. If a person refuses to obey a subpoena, the District Court
of Oklahoma County, on application by the Commissioner, may issue an
order requiring the person to appear before the Commissioner and
produce documents or give evidence regarding the matter under
investigation.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 19

D. The Commissioner may employ a person, request the Attorney
General, or request any other state, federal, or local law
enforcement agency to assist in enforcing this act.
E. The Commissioner may recover the reasonable costs incurred
in connection with an investigation conducted under this act from
the person that is the subject of the investigation.
SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1559 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commissioner may conduct an examination or investigation
of a licensee or authorized delegate or otherwise take independent
action authorized by this act or by a rule adopted or order issued
under this act as reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer
and enforce this act, regulations promulgated pursuant to this act,
and other applicable law, including the Bank Secrecy Act and the USA
PATRIOT Act. The Commissioner may:
1. Conduct an examination either on-site or off-site;
2. Conduct an examination in conjunction with an examination
conducted by representatives of other state agencies or agencies of
another state or of the federal government;
3. Accept the examination report of another state agency or an
agency of another state or of the federal government, or a report
prepared by an independent accounting firm, which on being accepted
is considered for all purposes as an official report of the
Commissioner; and
4. Summon and examine under oath a key individual or employee
of a licensee or authorized delegate and require the person to
produce records regarding any matter related to the condition and
business of the licensee or authorized delegate.
B. A licensee or authorized delegate shall provide, and the
Commissioner shall have full and complete access to, all records the
Commissioner may reasonably require to conduct a complete
examination. The records shall be provided at the location and in
the format specified by the Commissioner, provided, the Commissioner
may utilize multistate record production standards and examination
procedures when such standards reasonably achieve the requirements
of this section.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 20

C. Unless otherwise directed by the Commissioner, a licensee
shall pay all costs reasonably incurred in connection with an
examination of the licensee or the licensee’s authorized delegates.
SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1560 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. To efficiently and effectively administer and enforce this
act and to minimize regulatory burden, the Commissioner shall be
authorized and encouraged to participate in multistate supervisory
processes established between states and coordinated through the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors, Money Transmitter Regulators
Association, and affiliates and successors thereof for all licensees
that hold licenses in this state and other states. As a participant
in multistate supervision, the Commissioner may:
1. Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other
state and federal regulators in accordance with Section 7 of this
act;
2. Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or
information-sharing contracts or agreements with organizations the
membership of which is made up of state or federal governmental
agencies; and
3. Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with
organizations, the membership of which is made up of state or
federal governmental agencies, provided that the organizations agree
in writing to maintain the confidentiality and security of the
shared information in accordance with Section 7 of this act.
B. The Commissioner may not waive, and nothing in this section
shall constitute a waiver of, the Commissioner’s authority to
conduct an examination or investigation or otherwise take
independent action authorized by this act or a rule adopted or order
issued under this act to enforce compliance with applicable state or
federal law.
C. A joint examination or investigation, or acceptance of an
examination or investigation report, shall not waive an examination
assessment provided for in this act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 21

SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1561 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. In the event state money transmission jurisdiction is
conditioned on a federal law, any inconsistencies between a
provision of this act and the federal law governing money
transmission shall be governed by the applicable federal law to the
extent of the inconsistency.
B. In the event of any inconsistencies between this act and a
federal law that governs pursuant to this section, the Commissioner
may provide interpretive guidance that:
1. Identifies the inconsistency; and
2. Identifies the appropriate means of compliance with federal
law.
SECTION 12. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1562 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A person may not engage in the business of money
transmission or advertise, solicit, or hold itself out as providing
money transmission unless the person is licensed under this act;
B. Subsection A of this section shall not apply to:
1. A person that is an authorized delegate of a person licensed
under this act acting within the scope of authority conferred by a
written contract with the licensee; or
2. A person exempt pursuant to Section 4 of this act and does
not engage in money transmission outside the scope of such
exemption.
C. A license issued under this act is not transferable or
assignable.
SECTION 13. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1563 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 22

A. To establish consistent licensing between this state and
other states, the Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged
to:
1. Implement all licensing provisions of this act in a manner
consistent with other states that have adopted this act or
multistate licensing processes; and
2. Participate in nationwide protocols for licensing
cooperation and coordination among state regulators provided that
such protocols are consistent with this act.
B. In order to fulfill the purposes of this act, the
Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to establish
relationships or contracts with NMLS or other entities designated by
NMLS to enable the Commissioner to:
1. Collect and maintain records;
2. Coordinate multistate licensing processes and supervision
processes;
3. Process fees; and
4. Facilitate communication between states and licensees or
other persons subject to this act.
C. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
utilize NMLS for all aspects of licensing in accordance with this
act, including, but not limited to, license applications,
applications for acquisitions of control, surety bonds, reporting,
criminal history background checks, credit checks, fee processing,
and examinations.
D. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
utilize NMLS forms, processes, and functionalities in accordance
with this act. In the event NMLS does not provide functionality,
forms, or processes for a provision of this act, the Commissioner
shall be authorized and encouraged to strive to implement the
requirements in a manner that facilitates uniformity with respect to
licensing, supervision, reporting, and regulation of licensees which
are licensed in multiple jurisdictions.
E. For the purpose of participating in the Nationwide
Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the Commissioner shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 23

authorized to waive or modify, in whole or in part, by rule, policy,
or order, any or all of the requirements and to establish new
requirements as reasonably necessary to participate in the
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.
SECTION 14. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1564 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a
medium as prescribed by the Commissioner. Each form shall contain
content as set forth by rule, policy, instruction, or procedure of
the Commissioner and may be changed or updated at the discretion of
the Commissioner to carry out the purposes of this act and maintain
consistency with NMLS licensing standards and practices. The
application must state or contain, as applicable:
1. The legal name and residential and business addresses of the
applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in
conducting its business;
2. A list of any criminal convictions of the applicant and any
material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the
ten-year period preceding the submission of the application;
3. A description of any money transmission previously provided
by the applicant and the money transmission the applicant seeks to
provide in this state;
4. A list of the applicant’s proposed authorized delegates and
the locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized
delegates propose to engage in money transmission;
5. A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to
engage in money transmission and any license revocations,
suspensions, or other disciplinary action taken against the
applicant in another state;
6. Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership
proceedings affecting the applicant or a person in control of the
applicant;
7. A sample of a contract for authorized delegates, if
applicable;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 24

8. A sample of a payment instrument or stored value, as
applicable;
9. The name and address of any federally insured depository
financial institution through which the applicant plans to conduct
money transmission; and
10. Any other information the Commissioner or NMLS reasonably
requires with respect to the applicant.
B. If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall also
provide:
1. The date of the applicant’s incorporation or formation and
the state or country of incorporation or formation;
2. If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state
or country in which the applicant is incorporated or formed;
3. A brief description of the structure or organization of the
applicant, including any parent corporations or subsidiaries of the
applicant, and whether any parent corporations or subsidiaries are
publicly traded;
4. The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business
and residential addresses, and the employment history, as
applicable, in the ten-year period preceding the submission of the
application of each key individual and person in control of the
applicant;
5. A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation
in which a person in control of the applicant that is not an
individual has been involved in the ten-year period preceding the
submission of the application;
6. A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for
the most recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding
the submission of the application or, if determined to be acceptable
to the Commissioner, certified unaudited financial statements for
the most recent fiscal year or other period acceptable to the
Commissioner;
7. A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the
applicant for the most recent fiscal quarter;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 25

8. If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of
the most recent report filed with the United States Securities and
Exchange Commission under Section 13 of the federal Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C., Section 78m, as amended;
9. If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
a. a corporation publicly traded in the United States, a
copy of audited financial statements for the parent
corporation for the most recent fiscal year or a copy
of the parent corporation’s most recent report filed
under Section 13 of the federal Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. Section 78m, as amended, or
b. a corporation publicly traded outside the United
States, a copy of similar documentation filed with
the regulator of the parent corporation’s domicile
outside the United States;
10. The name and address of the applicant’s registered agent in
this state; and
11. Any other information the Commissioner reasonably requires
with respect to the applicant.
C. A nonrefundable application fee of Four Thousand Dollars
($4,000.00) and a nonrefundable license fee of Three Thousand
Dollars ($3,000.00) shall accompany an application for a license
under this section.
D. The Commissioner may waive one or more requirements of
subsections A and B of this section or permit an applicant to submit
other information in lieu of the required information.
SECTION 15. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1565 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any individual in control of a licensee or applicant, any
individual that seeks to acquire control of a licensee, and each key
individual shall furnish to the Commissioner through the NMLS the
following items:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 26

1. The individual’s fingerprints for purposes of a national
criminal history background check unless the person currently
resides outside of the United States and has resided outside of the
United States for the last ten (10) years; and
2. Personal history and experience, in a form and in a medium
prescribed by the Commissioner, to obtain the following:
a. an independent credit report from a consumer
reporting agency unless the individual does not have
a Social Security number, in which case, this
requirement shall be waived,
b. information related to any criminal convictions or
pending charges, and
c. information related to any regulatory or
administrative action and any civil litigation
involving claims of fraud, misrepresentation,
conversion, mismanagement of funds, breach of
fiduciary duty, or breach of contract.
B. If the individual has resided outside of the United States
at any time in the last ten (10) years, the individual shall also
provide an investigative background report prepared by an
independent search firm that meets the following requirements:
1. The search firm shall:
a. demonstrate that it has sufficient knowledge and
resources and employs accepted and reasonable
methodologies to conduct the research for the
background report, and
b. not be affiliated with or have an interest in the
individual it is researching; and
2. The investigative background report shall be written in the
English language and shall contain the following:
a. if available in the individual’s current jurisdiction
of residency, a comprehensive credit report, or any
equivalent information obtained or generated by the
independent search firm to accomplish such report,
including a search of the court data in the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 27

countries, provinces, states, cities, towns, and
contiguous areas where the individual resided and
worked,
b. criminal records information for the past ten (10)
years, including, but not limited to, felonies,
misdemeanors, or similar convictions for violations
of law in the countries, provinces, states, cities,
towns, and contiguous areas where the individual
resided and worked,
c. employment history,
d. media history, including an electronic search of
national and local publications, wire services, and
business applications, and
e. financial-services-related regulatory history,
including, but not limited to, money transmission,
securities, banking, insurance, and mortgage-related
industries.
SECTION 16. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1566 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. When an application for an original license under this act
is determined by the Commissioner to include all the items and
address all the matters that are required, the application shall be
deemed complete and the Commissioner shall notify the applicant in
writing of the date on which the application was deemed complete,
and:
1. The Commissioner shall approve or deny the application
within one hundred eighty (180) days after the completion date; or
2. The Commissioner may extend the review period at the
Commissioner’s discretion.
B. A determination by the Commissioner that an application is
complete and is accepted for processing shall mean only that the
application, on its face, appears to include all of the items,
including the criminal background check response, and address all of
the matters that are required. A determination by the Commissioner
that an application is complete and accepted for processing shall
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 28

not be considered a determination of the application or of the
sufficiency of the information provided.
C. When an application is filed and considered complete, the
Commissioner shall investigate the applicant’s financial condition
and responsibility, financial and business experience, character,
and general fitness. The Commissioner may conduct an on-site
investigation of the applicant. The applicant shall pay the
reasonable cost of any on-site investigation. The Commissioner may
issue a license to an applicant under this section if the
Commissioner finds all the following conditions have been fulfilled:
1. The applicant has complied with Sections 14 and 15 of this
act; and
2. The financial condition and responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of
the applicant, and the competence, experience, character, and
general fitness of the key individuals and persons in control of the
applicant, indicate that it is in the best interest of the public to
permit the applicant to engage in money transmission.
D. If an applicant avails itself or is otherwise subject to a
multistate licensing process:
1. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
accept the investigation results of a lead investigative state for
the purpose of subsection C of this section if the lead
investigative state has sufficient staffing, expertise, and meets
the minimum standards; or
2. If Oklahoma is a lead investigative state, the Commissioner
shall be authorized and encouraged to investigate the applicant
pursuant to subsection C of this section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process;
provided, however, in no case shall such timeframe be noncompliant
with the application period provided in paragraph 1 of subsection A
of this section.
E. The Commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of the
denial of a license application within thirty (30) days of the
decision to deny the application. The Commissioner shall set forth
in the notice of denial the specific reasons for the denial of the
application. If an applicant whose application is denied by the
Commissioner under this section chooses to appeal the denial, the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 29

applicant shall file an appeal with the Oklahoma State Banking Board
within fifteen (15) calendar days after the date of the written
notice of the denial.
F. The Commissioner may deny a license application if the
applicant has not received approval to operate as a money
transmitter in the state in which it is organized and the state in
which its main office is located. The Commissioner may deny a
license application based on the findings of another state.
G. The initial license term shall begin on the day the
application is approved. The license shall expire on December 31 of
the year in which the license term began, unless the initial license
date is between November 1 and December 31, in which instance the
initial license term shall run through December 31 of the following
year.
SECTION 17. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1567 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A license under this act shall be renewed annually. An
annual renewal fee of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) shall be
paid no more than sixty (60) days before the license expiration.
The renewal term shall be for a period of one (1) year and shall
begin on January 1 of each year after the initial license term and
shall expire on December 31 of the year the renewal term begins.
B. A licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal
fee, in a form and medium prescribed by the Commissioner. The
renewal report shall state or contain a description of each material
change in information from the original license application which
has not been reported to the Commissioner.
C. The Commissioner may, for good cause, grant an extension of
the renewal date.
D. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
utilize the NMLS to process license renewals, provided that such
functionality is consistent with this section.
SECTION 18. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1568 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 30

A. If a licensee does not continue to meet the qualifications
or satisfy the requirements that apply to an applicant for a new
money transmission license, the Commissioner may suspend or revoke a
license in accordance with the procedures established by this act or
other applicable state law for such suspension or revocation.
B. An applicant for a money transmission license must
demonstrate that it meets or will meet, and a money transmission
licensee shall at all times meet, the requirements in Sections 33,
34, and 35 of this act.
SECTION 19. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1569 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking
to acquire control of a licensee shall obtain the written approval
of the Commissioner prior to acquiring control. An individual shall
not be deemed to acquire control of a licensee and shall not be
subject to the acquisition of control provisions when that
individual becomes a key individual in the ordinary course of
business.
B. A person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control of a licensee shall, in cooperation with the
licensee:
1. Submit an application in a form and medium prescribed by the
Commissioner; and
2. Submit a nonrefundable fee of Four Thousand Dollars
($4,000.00) with the request for approval.
C. Upon request, the Commissioner may permit a licensee or the
person, or group of persons acting in concert, to submit some or all
of the information required by the Commissioner pursuant to
paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section without using the NMLS.
D. The application required by paragraph 1 of subsection B of
this section shall include information required by Section 15 of
this act for any new key individuals who have not previously
completed the requirements of Section 15 of this act for a licensee.
E. 1. When an application for acquisition of control under
this section appears to include all the items and address all
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 31

matters that are required, the application shall be considered
complete and the Commissioner shall promptly notify the applicant in
a record of the date on which the application was determined to be
complete and:
a. the Commissioner shall approve or deny the
application within ninety (90) days after the
completion date; or
b. the Commissioner may extend the review period upon
notice to the applicant.
2. Provided, however, the Commissioner may not approve an
application for acquisition of control if the applicant has not
received approval regarding the acquisition of control in the state
in which it is organized and the state in which its main office is
located.
3. If the application is not approved or denied before the
ninety-first day after the completion date, and if applicant has
received approval regarding the acquisition of control in the state
in which it is organized and the state in which its main office is
located, the application shall be approved and the person or group
of persons acting in concert shall not be prohibited from acquiring
control.
F. A determination by the Commissioner that an application is
complete and is accepted for processing shall mean only that the
application, on its face, appears to include all of the items and
address all of the matters that are required. A determination by
the Commissioner that an application is complete and is accepted for
processing shall not mean an assessment of the substance of the
application or of the sufficiency of the information provided.
G. When an application is filed and considered complete under
subsection E of this section, the Commissioner shall investigate the
financial condition and responsibility, financial and business
experience, character, and general fitness of the person, or group
of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire control. The
Commissioner may approve an acquisition of control pursuant to this
section if the Commissioner finds that all of the following
conditions have been fulfilled:
1. The requirements of subsections B and D of this section have
been met, as applicable; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 32

2. The financial condition and responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of
the person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control, and the competence, experience, character, and
general fitness of the key individuals and persons that would be in
control of the licensee after the acquisition of control indicate
that it is in the interest of the public to permit the person, or
group of persons acting in concert, to control the licensee.
H. If an applicant avails itself or is otherwise subject to a
multistate licensing process:
1. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
accept the investigation results of a lead investigative state for
the purpose of subsection G of this section if the lead
investigative state has sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum
standards; or
2. If Oklahoma is a lead investigative state, the Commissioner
shall be authorized and encouraged to investigate the applicant
pursuant to subsection G of this section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
I. The Commissioner shall issue a formal written notice of the
denial of an application to acquire control within thirty (30) days
of the decision to deny the application. The Commissioner shall set
forth in the notice of denial the specific reasons for the denial of
the application. If an applicant whose application is denied by the
Commissioner under this section chooses to appeal the denial, the
applicant shall file an appeal with the Oklahoma State Banking Board
within fifteen (15) calendar days after the date of the written
notice of the denial.
J. The requirements of subsections A and B of this section
shall not apply to any of the following:
1. A person who acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting
at a designated meeting of the shareholders or holders of voting
shares or voting interests of a licensee or a person in control of a
licensee;
2. A person who acquires control of a licensee by devise or
descent;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 33

3. A person who acquires control of a licensee as a personal
representative, custodian, guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as
an officer appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction or by
operation of law;
4. A person who is exempt under paragraph 7 of Section 4 of
this act;
5. A person who the Commissioner determines is not subject to
subsection A of this section based on the public interest;
6. A public offering of securities of a licensee or a person in
control of a licensee; or
7. An internal reorganization of a person in control of the
licensee where the ultimate person in control of the licensee
remains the same.
K. Persons in paragraphs 2, 3, 4, 6, and 7 of subsection J of
this section, in cooperation with the licensee, shall notify the
Commissioner within fifteen (15) days after the acquisition of
control.
L. 1. The requirements of subsections A and B of this section
shall not apply to a person who has complied with and received
approval to engage in money transmission under this act or was
identified as a person in control in a prior application filed with
and approved by the Commissioner or by an MSB-accredited state
pursuant to a multistate licensing process, provided that:
a. the person has not had a license revoked or suspended
or controlled a licensee that has had a license
revoked or suspended while the person was in control
of the licensee in the previous five (5) years,
b. if the person is a licensee, the person is well
managed and has received at least a satisfactory
rating for compliance at its most recent examination
by an MSB-accredited state, if such a rating was
given,
c. the licensee to be acquired is projected to meet the
requirements of Sections 33, 34, and 35 of this act
after the acquisition of control is completed, and if
the person acquiring control is a licensee, that
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 34

licensee is also projected to meet the requirements
of Sections 33, 34, and 35 of this act after the
acquisition of control is completed,
d. the licensee to be acquired will not implement any
material changes to its business plan as a result of
the acquisition of control, and if the person
acquiring control is a licensee, that licensee also
will not implement any material changes to its
business plan as a result of the acquisition of
control, and
e. the person provides notice of the acquisition in
cooperation with the licensee and attests to
subparagraphs a, b, c, and d of paragraph 1 of
subsection L of this section in a form and in a
medium prescribed by the Commissioner.
2. If the notice is not disapproved within thirty (30) days
after the date on which the notice was determined to be complete,
the notice shall be deemed approved.
M. Before filing an application for approval to acquire control
of a licensee, a person may request in writing a determination from
the Commissioner as to whether the person would be considered a
person in control of a licensee upon consummation of a proposed
transaction. If the Commissioner determines that the person would
not be a person in control of a licensee, the proposed person and
transaction shall not be subject to the requirements of subsections
A and B of this section.
N. If a multistate licensing process includes a determination
pursuant to subsection M of this section and an applicant avails
itself or is otherwise subject to the multistate licensing process:
1. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
accept the control determination of a lead investigative state with
sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards for the
purpose of subsection M of this section; or
2. If Oklahoma is a lead investigative state, the Commissioner
shall be authorized and encouraged to investigate the applicant
pursuant to subsection M of this section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 35

SECTION 20. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1570 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee adding or replacing any key individual shall:
1. Provide notice in a manner prescribed by the Commissioner
within fifteen (15) days after the effective date of the key
individual’s appointment; and
2. Provide information as required by Section 15 of this act
within forty-five (45) days of the effective date.
B. Within ninety (90) days of the date on which the notice
provided pursuant to subsection A of this section was determined to
be complete, the Commissioner may issue a notice of disapproval of a
key individual if the competence, experience, character, or
integrity of the individual would not be in the best interests of
the public or the customers of the licensee to permit the individual
to be a key individual of such licensee.
C. A notice of disapproval shall contain a statement of the
basis for disapproval and shall be sent to the licensee and the
disapproved individual. If a licensee chooses to appeal a notice of
disapproval, the licensee shall file an appeal with the Oklahoma
State Banking Board within fifteen (15) calendar days after the date
of the written notice of the disapproval.
D. If the notice provided pursuant to subsection A of this
section is not disapproved within one hundred twenty (120) days
after the date on which the notice was determined to be complete,
the key individual shall be deemed approved, unless the Commissioner
has notified the licensee that the review time has been extended.
E. If a multistate licensing process includes a key individual
notice review and disapproval process pursuant to this section and
the licensee avails itself or is otherwise subject to the multistate
licensing process:
1. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to
accept the determination of another state if the investigating state
has sufficient staffing, expertise, and minimum standards for the
purpose of this section; or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 36

2. If Oklahoma is a lead investigative state, the Commissioner
shall be authorized and encouraged to investigate the applicant
pursuant to subsection B of this section and the timeframes
established by agreement through the multistate licensing process.
SECTION 21. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1571 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each licensee shall submit a report of condition within
forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar quarter, or within
any extended time as the Commissioner may prescribe.
B. The report of condition shall include:
1. Financial information at the licensee level;
2. Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction
information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the
licensee is licensed to engage in money transmission;
3. Permissible investments report;
4. Transaction destination country reporting for money received
for transmission, if applicable; and
5. Any other information the Commissioner reasonably requires
with respect to the licensee. The Commissioner shall be authorized
and encouraged to utilize NMLS for the submission of the report
required by this section and is authorized to change or update as
necessary the requirements of this section to carry out the purposes
of this act and maintain consistency with NMLS reporting.
C. The information required by paragraph 4 of subsection B of
this section shall only be included in a report of condition
submitted within forty-five (45) days of the end of the fourth
calendar quarter.
SECTION 22. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1572 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each licensee shall, within ninety (90) days after the end
of each fiscal year, or within any extended time as the Commissioner
may prescribe, file with the Commissioner:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 37

1. An audited financial statement of the licensee for the
fiscal year prepared in accordance with United States generally
accepted accounting principles; and
2. Any other information as the Commissioner may reasonably
require.
B. The audited financial statements shall be prepared by an
independent certified public accountant or independent public
accountant who is satisfactory to the Commissioner.
C. The audited financial statements shall include or be
accompanied by a certificate of opinion of the independent certified
public accountant or independent public accountant that is
satisfactory in form and content to the Commissioner. If the
certificate or opinion is qualified, the Commissioner may order the
licensee to take any action as the Commissioner may find necessary
to enable the independent or certified public accountant or
independent public accountant to remove the qualification.
SECTION 23. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1573 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each licensee shall submit a report of authorized delegates
within forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar quarter. The
Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged to utilize the NMLS
for the submission of the report required by this section provided
that such functionality is consistent with the requirements of this
section.
B. The authorized delegate report shall include, at a minimum,
each authorized delegate’s:
1. Company legal name;
2. Taxpayer employer identification number;
3. Principal provider identifier;
4. Physical address;
5. Mailing address;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 38

6. Any business conducted in other states;
7. Any fictitious or trade name;
8. Contact person name, phone number, and email;
9. Start date as licensee’s authorized delegate;
10. End date acting as licensee’s authorized delegate, if
applicable;
11. Any applicable court orders; and
12. Any other information the Commissioner reasonably requires
with respect to the authorized delegate.
SECTION 24. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1574 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee shall file a report with the Commissioner within
one (1) business day of the licensee becoming aware of the
occurrence of any of the following events:
1. The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under
the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C., Section 101 et seq.,
as amended, for bankruptcy or reorganization;
2. The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for
receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or
administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or
the making of a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
or
3. The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend its
license in a state or country in which the licensee engages in
business or is licensed.
B. A licensee shall file a report with the Commissioner within
three (3) business days of the licensee becoming aware of the
occurrence of a felony charge or conviction of:
1. The licensee or a key individual;
2. A person in control of the licensee; or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 39

3. An authorized delegate.
SECTION 25. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1575 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A licensee and an authorized delegate shall file all reports
required by federal currency reporting, record-keeping, and
suspicious activity reporting requirements as set forth in the Bank
Secrecy Act and other federal and state laws pertaining to money
laundering. The timely filing of a complete and accurate report
required under this section with the appropriate federal agency
shall be deemed compliant with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 26. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1576 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee shall maintain the following records, for
determining its compliance with this act, for at least five (5)
years:
1. A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation
sold;
2. A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all
asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;
3. Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
4. Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;
5. Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation
paid within the five-year period;
6. A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the
licensee’s authorized delegates; and
7. Any other records the Commissioner reasonably requires.
B. The items specified in this section may be maintained in any
form of record.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 40

C. Records specified in this section may be maintained outside
this state if the records are made accessible to the Commissioner
within seven (7) business days after a request for the records is
received.
D. All records maintained by the licensee as required in this
section shall be open to inspection by the Commissioner pursuant to
subsection A of Section 7 of this act.
SECTION 27. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1577 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, “remit” means to make direct
payments of money to a licensee or its representative authorized to
receive money or to deposit money in a bank in an account specified
by the licensee.
B. Before a licensee shall be authorized to conduct business
through an authorized delegate or allow a person to act as the
licensee’s authorized delegate, the licensee shall:
1. Adopt, and update as necessary, written policies and
procedures reasonably designed to ensure that the licensee’s
authorized delegates comply with applicable state and federal law;
2. Enter into a written contract that complies with subsection
D of this section; and
3. Conduct a reasonable risk-based background investigation
sufficient for the licensee to determine whether the authorized
delegate has complied, and will likely comply, with applicable state
and federal law.
C. An authorized delegate shall operate in full compliance with
this act.
D. The written contract required by subsection B of this
section shall be signed by the licensee and the authorized delegate
and, at a minimum, shall:
1. Appoint the person signing the contract as the licensee’s
authorized delegate with the authority to conduct money transmission
on behalf of the licensee;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 41

2. Set forth the nature and scope of the relationship between
the licensee and the authorized delegate and the respective rights
and responsibilities of both parties;
3. Require the authorized delegate to agree to fully comply
with all applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations
pertaining to money transmission, including this act and any
regulations promulgated under this act and relevant provisions of
the Bank Secrecy Act and the USA PATRIOT Act;
4. Require the authorized delegate to remit and handle money
and monetary value in accordance with the terms of the contract
between the licensee and the authorized delegate;
5. Impose a trust on money and monetary value net of fees
received for money transmission for the benefit of the licensee;
6. Require the authorized delegate to prepare and maintain
records as required by this act and any regulations promulgated
under this act or as reasonably requested by the Commissioner;
7. Acknowledge that the authorized delegate consents to
examination or investigation by the Commissioner;
8. State that the licensee is subject to regulation by the
Commissioner and that, as part of that regulation, the Commissioner
may suspend or revoke an authorized delegate designation or require
the licensee to terminate an authorized delegate designation; and
9. Acknowledge receipt of the written policies and procedures
required under paragraph 1 of subsection B of this section.
E. If the licensee’s license is suspended, revoked,
surrendered, or expired, the licensee shall, within five (5)
business days, provide documentation to the Commissioner that the
licensee has notified all applicable authorized delegates of the
licensee whose names are in a record filed with the Commissioner of
the suspension, revocation, surrender, or expiration of a license.
Upon suspension, revocation, surrender, or expiration of a license,
applicable authorized delegates shall immediately cease to provide
money transmission as an authorized delegate of the licensee.
F. An authorized delegate of a licensee holds in trust for the
benefit of the licensee all money net of fees received from money
transmission. If any authorized delegate commingles any funds
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 42

received from money transmission with any other funds or property
owned or controlled by the authorized delegate, all commingled funds
and other property shall be considered held in trust in favor of the
licensee in an amount equal to the amount of money net of fees
received from money transmission.
G. An authorized delegate may not use a subdelegate to conduct
money transmission on behalf of a licensee.
SECTION 28. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1578 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A person shall not engage in the business of money transmission
on behalf of a person not licensed under this act or not exempt
pursuant to Section 4 of this act. A person who engages in such
activity and provides money transmissions to the same extent as if
the person were a licensee shall be jointly and severally liable
with the unlicensed or nonexempt person. Any business for which a
license is required under this act that is conducted by an
authorized delegate outside the scope of authority conferred in the
contract between the authorized delegate and the licensee shall be
deemed an unlicensed activity.
SECTION 29. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1579 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Every licensee shall forward all money received for
transmission in accordance with the terms of the agreement between
the licensee and the sender unless the licensee has a reasonable
belief or a reasonable basis to believe that the sender may be a
victim of fraud or that a crime or violation of law, rule, or
regulation has occurred, is occurring, or may occur.
B. If a licensee fails to forward money received for
transmission in accordance with this section, the licensee shall
respond to inquiries by the sender with the reason for the failure
unless providing a response would violate a state or federal law,
rule, or regulation.
SECTION 30. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1580 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 43

A. This section shall not apply to:
1. Money received for transmission subject to the federal
Remittance Rule, 12 C.F.R., Part 1005, Subpart B, as amended; or
2. Money received for transmission pursuant to a written
agreement between the licensee and payee to process payments for
goods or services provided by the payee.
B. Every licensee shall issue a refund to the sender within ten
(10) days of receipt of the sender’s written request for a refund of
any and all money received for transmission unless any of the
following occurs:
1. The money has been forwarded within ten (10) days of the
date on which the money was received for transmission;
2. Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount
of money to the person designated by the sender within ten (10) days
of the date on which the money was received for transmission;
3. The agreement between the licensee and the sender instructs
the licensee to forward the money at a time that is beyond ten (10)
days of the date on which the money was received for transmission.
If funds have not yet been forwarded in accordance with the terms of
the agreement between the licensee and the sender, the licensee
shall issue a refund in accordance with the provisions of this
section;
4. The refund is requested for a transaction that the licensee
has not completed based on a reasonable belief or a reasonable basis
to believe that a crime or violation of law, rule, or regulation has
occurred, is occurring, or may occur; or
5. The refund request does not enable the licensee to:
a. identify the sender’s name and address or telephone
number, or
b. identify the particular transaction to be refunded,
in the event the sender has multiple transactions
outstanding.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 44

SECTION 31. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1581 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This section shall not apply to:
1. Money received for transmission subject to the federal
Remittance Rule, 12 C.F.R., Part 1005, Subpart B, as amended;
2. Money received for transmission that is not primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes;
3. Money received for transmission pursuant to a written
agreement between the licensee and payee to process payments for
goods or services provided by the payee; or
4. Payroll processing services.
B. For purposes of this section “receipt” means a paper
receipt, electronic record, or other written confirmation. For a
transaction conducted in person, the receipt may be provided
electronically if the sender requests or agrees to receive an
electronic receipt. For a transaction conducted electronically or
by phone, a receipt may be provided electronically. All electronic
receipts shall be provided in a retainable form.
C. 1. Every licensee or its authorized delegate shall provide
the sender a receipt for money received for transmission. The
receipt shall contain the following information, as applicable:
a. the name of the sender,
b. the name of the designated recipient,
c. the date of the transaction,
d. the unique transaction or identification number,
e. the name of the licensee, NMLS Unique ID, the
licensee’s business address, and the licensee’s
customer service telephone number,
f. the amount of the transaction in United States
dollars,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 45

g. any fee charged by the licensee to the sender for the
transaction, and
h. any taxes collected by the licensee from the sender
for the transaction.
2. The receipt required by this section shall be in English and
in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized
delegate to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in
writing, for a transaction conducted in person, electronically, or
by phone, if other than English.
3. Nothing in this section shall affect or eliminate the
disclosures required to be provided under Section 1520.1 of Title 6
of the Oklahoma Statutes in connection with digital asset kiosk
transactions.
SECTION 32. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1582 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee that provides payroll processing services shall:
1. Issue reports to clients detailing client payroll
obligations in advance of the payroll funds being deducted from an
account; and
2. Make worker paystubs or equivalent statements available to
workers.
B. This section shall not apply to a licensee providing payroll
processing services where the licensee’s client designates the
intended recipients to the licensee and is responsible for providing
the information required by paragraph 2 of subsection A of this
section.
SECTION 33. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1583 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee under this act shall maintain at all times a
tangible net worth of the greater of One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or three percent (3%) of total assets for the first
One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00), two percent (2%) of
additional assets for One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00)
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 46

to One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), and one-half of a
percent (1/2%) of additional assets for over One Billion Dollars
($1,000,000,000.00).
B. Tangible net worth shall be demonstrated at initial
application by the applicant’s most recent audited or unaudited
financial statements pursuant to paragraph 6 of subsection B of
Section 14 of this act.
C. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section,
the Commissioner shall have the authority, for good cause shown, to
exempt, in part or in whole, any applicant or licensee from the
requirements of this section.
SECTION 34. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1584 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An applicant for a money transmission license shall provide,
and a licensee at all times shall maintain, security consisting of a
surety bond in a form satisfactory to the Commissioner or, with the
Commissioner’s approval, a deposit instead of a bond in accordance
with this section.
B. The amount of the required security shall be no less than
Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for applicants and
licensees that operate digital asset kiosks or provide services
related to digital assets.
C. If an applicant or licensee does not operate digital asset
kiosks or provide services related to digital assets, the amount of
the required security shall be:
1. The greater of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or
an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the licensee’s
average daily money transmission liability in this state calculated
for the most recently completed three-month period, up to a maximum
of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00); or
2. In the event that the licensee’s tangible net worth exceeds
ten percent (10%) of total assets, the licensee shall maintain a
surety bond of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00).
D. A licensee may exceed the maximum required bond amount
pursuant to paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section 36 of this act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 47

E. The Commissioner may increase the amount of security
required to a maximum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) if the
financial condition of a licensee so requires, as evidenced by
reduction of net worth, financial losses, or other relevant
criteria.
SECTION 35. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1585 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A licensee shall maintain at all times permissible
investments that have a market value, computed in accordance with
United States generally accepted accounting principles, of not less
than the aggregate amount of all its outstanding money transmission
obligations.
B. Except for permissible investments enumerated in subsection
A of Section 36 of this act, the Commissioner, with respect to any
licensee, may by rule or order limit the extent to which a specific
investment maintained by a licensee within a class of permissible
investments may be considered a permissible investment, if the
specific investment represents undue risk to customers, not
reflected in the market value of investments.
C. Permissible investments, even if commingled with other
assets of the licensee, shall be held in trust for the benefit of
the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding money
transmission obligations in the event of insolvency, the filing of a
petition by or against the licensee for bankruptcy or reorganization
under the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C., Section 101 et
seq., as amended, the filing of a petition by or against the
licensee for receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or
administrative proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or
in the event of an action by a creditor against the licensee who is
not a beneficiary of the trust. No permissible investments
impressed with a trust pursuant to this section shall be subject to
attachment, levy of execution, or sequestration by order of any
court, except for a beneficiary of this statutory trust.
D. Upon the establishment of a trust in accordance with
subsection C of this section, or when any funds are drawn on a
letter of credit pursuant to paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section
36 of this act, the Commissioner shall notify the applicable
regulator of each state in which the licensee is licensed to engage
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 48

in money transmission, if any, of the establishment of the trust or
the funds drawn on the letter of credit, as applicable. Notice
shall be deemed satisfied if performed pursuant to a multistate
agreement or through the NMLS. Funds drawn on a letter of credit,
and any other permissible investments held in trust for the benefit
of the purchasers and holders of the licensee’s outstanding money
transmission obligations, shall be deemed held in trust for the
benefit of such purchasers and holders on a pro rata and equitable
basis in accordance with laws pursuant to which permissible
investments are required to be held in this state, and other states,
as applicable. Any statutory trust established hereunder shall be
terminated upon extinguishment of all the licensee’s outstanding
money transmission obligations.
E. The Commissioner, by rule, policy, or order, may allow other
types of investments that he or she determines are of sufficient
liquidity and quality to be a permissible investment. The
Commissioner shall be authorized to participate in efforts with
other state regulators to determine what other types of investments
are of sufficient liquidity and quality to be a permissible
investment.
SECTION 36. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1586 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The following investments are permissible under Section 35
of this act:
1. Cash including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds
in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers in
a federally insured depository financial institution, and cash
equivalents including automated clearing house (ACH) items in
transit to the licensee and ACH items or international wires in
transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, cash in smart
safes, cash in licensee-owned locations, debit-card- or credit-card-
funded transmission receivables owed by any bank, or money market
mutual funds rated AAA by S&P Global Ratings, or the equivalent from
any eligible rating service;
2. Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an
insured depository institution, as defined in Section 3 of the
Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C., Section 1813, as amended,
or an insured credit union, as defined under the Federal Credit
Union Act, 12 U.S.C., Section 1752, as amended;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 49

3. An obligation of the United States or a commission, agency,
or instrumentality thereof; an obligation that is guaranteed fully
as to principal and interest by the United States; or an obligation
of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;
4. The full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of
credit for which the stated beneficiary is the Commissioner and that
stipulates that the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under
the letter of credit and present it to obtain funds up to the letter
of credit amount within seven (7) days of presentation of the items
required by subparagraph c of this paragraph.
a. The letter of credit shall:
(1) be issued by a federally insured depository
financial institution, a foreign bank that is
authorized under federal law to maintain a
federal agency or federal branch office in a
state or states, or a foreign bank that is
authorized under state law to maintain a branch
in a state and the issuer:
(a) bears an eligible rating or whose parent
corporation bears an eligible rating, and
(b) is regulated, supervised, and examined by
federal or state authorities having
regulatory authority over banks, credit
unions, and trust companies,
(2) be irrevocable, unconditional, and indicate that
it is not subject to any condition or
qualifications outside of the letter of credit,
(3) not contain reference to any other agreements,
documents, or entities, or otherwise provide for
any security interest in the licensee, and
(4) contain an issue date and expiration date, and
expressly provide for automatic extension,
without a written amendment, for an additional
period of one (1) year from the present or each
future expiration date, unless the issuer of the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 50

letter of credit notifies the Commissioner in
writing by certified or registered mail or
courier mail, or other receipted means, at least
sixty (60) days prior to any expiration date
that the irrevocable letter of credit will not
be extended.
b. In the event of any notice of expiration or non-
extension of a letter of credit issued under division
(4) of subparagraph a of this paragraph, the licensee
shall be required to demonstrate to the satisfaction
of the Commissioner fifteen (15) days prior to
expiration that the licensee maintains and will
maintain permissible investments in accordance with
this subsection upon the expiration of the letter of
credit. If the licensee is not able to do so, the
Commissioner may draw on the letter of credit in an
amount up to the amount necessary to meet the
licensee’s requirements to maintain permissible
investments in accordance with subsection A of
Section 35 of this act. Any such draw shall be
offset against the licensee’s outstanding money
transmission obligations. The drawn funds shall be
held in trust by the Commissioner or the
Commissioner’s designated agent, to the extent
authorized by law, for the benefit of the purchasers
and holders of the licensee’s outstanding money
transmission obligations.
c. The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of
the letter of credit will honor, at sight, a
presentation made by the beneficiary to the issuer of
the following documents on or prior to the expiration
date of the letter of credit:
(1) the original letter of credit including any
amendments, and
(2) a written statement from the beneficiary stating
that any of the following events have occurred:
(a) the filing of a petition by or against the
licensee under the United States Bankruptcy
Code, 11 U.S.C., Section 101 et seq., as
amended, for bankruptcy or reorganization,
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 51

(b) the filing of a petition by or against the
licensee for receivership, or the
commencement of any other judicial or
administrative proceeding for its
dissolution or reorganization,
(c) the seizure of assets of a licensee by the
Commissioner pursuant to an emergency order
issued in accordance with applicable law, on
the basis of an action, violation, or
condition that has caused or is likely to
cause the insolvency of the licensee, or
(d) the beneficiary has received notice of
expiration or nonextension of a letter of
credit and the licensee has failed to
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the
beneficiary that the licensee will maintain
permissible investments in accordance with
subsection A of Section 35 of this act upon
the expiration or nonextension of the letter
of credit.
d. The Commissioner may designate an agent to serve on
the Commissioner’s behalf as beneficiary to a letter
of credit so long as the agent and letter of credit
meet requirements established by the Commissioner.
The Commissioner’s agent may serve as agent for
multiple licensing authorities for a single
irrevocable letter of credit if the proceeds of the
drawable amount for the purposes of this paragraph
are assigned to the Commissioner.
e. The Commissioner shall be authorized and encouraged
to participate in multistate processes designed to
facilitate the issuance and administration of letters
of credit, including, but not limited to, services
provided by the NMLS and State Regulatory Registry,
LLC;
5. One hundred percent (100%) of the surety bond or deposit
provided for under Section 34 of this act that exceeds the average
daily money transmission liability in this state; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 52

6. Stablecoin, to the extent the outstanding transmission
obligations received by the licensee are in the same kind of
stablecoin. For purposes of this subsection, stablecoin shall be
required to be held, stored, or kept in custody of the licensee
directly or by a third-party custodian that meets the qualifications
prescribed by the Commissioner.
B. Unless permitted by the Commissioner by rule, policy, or
order to exceed the limit as set forth herein, the following
investments shall be permissible under Section 35 of this act to the
extent specified:
1. Receivables that are payable to a licensee from its
authorized delegates in the ordinary course of business that are
less than seven (7) days old and up to fifty percent (50%) of the
aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible investments;
2. Of the receivables permissible under paragraph 1 of
subsection B of this section, receivables that are payable to a
licensee from a single authorized delegate in the ordinary course of
business may not exceed ten percent (10%) of the aggregate value of
the licensee’s total permissible investments;
3. The following investments shall be permissible up to twenty
percent (20%) per category and combined up to fifty percent (50%) of
the aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible investments:
a. a short-term investment, up to six (6) months,
bearing an eligible rating,
b. commercial paper bearing an eligible rating,
c. a bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible
rating,
d. United States tri-party repurchase agreements
collateralized at one hundred percent (100%) or more
with United States government or agency securities,
municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an
eligible rating,
e. money market mutual funds rated less than AAA but
equal to or higher than A- by S&P Global Ratings, or
the equivalent from any other eligible rating
service, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 53

f. a mutual fund or other investment fund composed
solely and exclusively of one or more permissible
investments listed in paragraphs 1 through 3 of
subsection A of this section; and
4. Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds
in such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee’s customers,
at foreign depository institutions are permissible up to ten percent
(10%) of the aggregate value of the licensee’s total permissible
investments if the licensee has received a satisfactory rating in
its most recent examination and the foreign depository institution:
a. has an eligible rating,
b. is registered under the Foreign Account Tax
Compliance Act,
c. is not located in any country subject to sanctions
from the Office of Foreign Assets Control, and
d. is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative
jurisdiction as designated by the Financial Action
Task Force.
SECTION 37. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1587 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke a license or order a
licensee to revoke the designation of an authorized delegate if:
1. The licensee violates this act or a rule adopted or an order
issued under this act;
2. The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the Commissioner;
3. The licensee engages in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
4. An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a
state or federal anti-money-laundering statute or violates a rule
adopted or an order issued under this act if the violation was a
result of the licensee’s willful misconduct or willful blindness;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 54

5. The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of
the licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee,
key individual, or responsible person of the authorized delegate
indicates that it is not in the public’s best interest to permit the
licensee or authorized delegate to provide money transmissions;
6. The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice;
7. The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of its
obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its
creditors;
8. The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after
the Commissioner issues and serves upon the licensee a final order,
including a finding that the authorized delegate has violated this
act; or
9. The licensee’s license has been suspended or revoked in
another state.
B. In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe
or unsound practice, the Commissioner may consider the size and
condition of the licensee’s money transmission obligations, the
magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of this act, and
the previous conduct of the person involved.
SECTION 38. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1588 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Commissioner may issue an order suspending or revoking
the designation of an authorized delegate if the Commissioner finds
that:
1. The authorized delegate violated this act or a rule adopted
or an order issued under this act;
2. The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an
examination or investigation by the Commissioner;
3. The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 55

4. The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a
state or federal anti-money-laundering statute;
5. The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of
the authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized
delegate indicates that it is not in the public’s best interest to
permit the authorized delegate to provide money transmissions; or
6. The authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound
practice.
B. In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in
an unsafe or unsound practice, the Commissioner may consider the
size and condition of the authorized delegate’s provision of money
transmission obligations, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of
the violation of this act or a rule adopted or order issued under
this act, and the previous conduct of the authorized delegate.
C. An authorized delegate may apply for relief from a
suspension or revocation of designation as an authorized delegate
according to procedures prescribed by the Commissioner.
SECTION 39. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1589 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If the Commissioner determines that any conduct is likely a
violation of this act or of a rule adopted or an order issued under
this act by a licensee or authorized delegate and is likely to cause
immediate and irreparable harm to the licensee, its customers, or
the public or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets
of the licensee, the Commissioner may issue an order requiring the
licensee or authorized delegate to cease and desist the conduct.
The order shall become effective upon service of the order on the
licensee or authorized delegate.
B. The Commissioner may issue an order against a licensee to
cease and desist from providing money transmission through an
authorized delegate that is the subject of a separate order by the
Commissioner.
C. An order to cease and desist remains effective and
enforceable pending the completion of an administrative proceeding.
An order to cease and desist shall become permanent unless the
licensee or authorized delegate files an appeal with the Oklahoma
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 56

State Banking Board within fifteen (15) calendar days of the date of
the order.
SECTION 40. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1590 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with
a person to resolve a matter arising under this act or a rule
adopted or order issued under this act. A consent order shall be
signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person’s
authorized representative and shall indicate agreement with the
terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that the
consent order does not constitute an admission by the person that he
or she has violated this act or a rule adopted or an order issued
under this act. A consent order shall be a final order and may not
be appealed.
SECTION 41. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1591 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A person who intentionally makes a false statement,
misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or
required to be maintained under this act or that intentionally makes
a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense punishable by
imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F of Section
20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or by a fine of Ten
Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
B. A person who knowingly engages in an activity for which a
license is required under this act without being licensed under this
act shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through
F of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or by a fine
of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
SECTION 42. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1592 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 57

The Commissioner may assess a fine against a person who violates
this act or a rule adopted or an order issued under this act in an
amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation
for each day a violation is outstanding, plus any costs or expenses
for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including
reasonable attorney fees.
SECTION 43. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1593 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. If the Commissioner has reason to believe that a person has
violated or is violating Section 12 of this act, the Commissioner
may issue an order requiring that the person cease and desist from
the violation of Section 12 of this act.
B. In an emergency, the Commissioner may petition the District
Court of Oklahoma County for the issuance of an ex parte temporary
restraining order pursuant to the rules of civil procedure.
C. An order to cease and desist shall:
1. Become effective upon service of it upon the person;
2. Remain effective and enforceable pending the completion of
an administrative proceeding; and
3. Become permanent unless the person files an appeal with the
Oklahoma State Banking Board within fifteen (15) calendar days of
the date of the order.
SECTION 44. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1594 of Title 6, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A person providing payroll processing services in this state
without a license shall not be considered in violation of Section 12
of this act if the person applies for a license within six (6)
months of the enactment of this act. The Commissioner may extend
the transition period in conjunction with the extension of an
application period.
SECTION 45. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 363, O.S.L.
2025 (6 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1520.1), is amended to read as
follows:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 58

Section 1520.1. A. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not
engage in digital asset kiosk transactions or hold itself out as
being able to engage in digital asset kiosk transactions with or on
behalf of another person unless the digital asset kiosk operator is
licensed in this state as a money transmitter pursuant to the
Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act Oklahoma Money
Transmission Modernization Act.
1. Any digital asset kiosk operator acting in violation of this
subsection shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor,
punishable by a fine not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor
more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per violation, or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days
nor more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
2. Any digital asset kiosk which is used operated by a digital
asset kiosk operator in violation of this subsection may be seized
at the direction of the Attorney General by any commissioned peace
officer in this state. The procedures set forth in Section 1738 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall apply to any digital asset
kiosk seized under this subsection.
3. The Attorney General is authorized to promulgate rules to
effectuate the provisions of this subsection.
4. Any customer who has been fraudulently induced to engage in
digital asset transactions using a digital asset kiosk operated in
violation of this subsection may file a civil suit against the
digital asset kiosk operator for the amount of any losses sustained
by the customer related to such digital asset transactions.
B. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not locate or relocate,
or allow a third party to locate or relocate, a digital asset kiosk
in this state unless the digital asset kiosk operator has provided
notice of intent to locate or relocate a digital asset kiosk to the
Oklahoma State Banking Department no less than ten (10) days prior
to its activation. The notice to the Banking Department shall
contain the same information for the digital asset kiosk to be
located or relocated as is required in the quarterly location report
pursuant to subsection C of this section.
C. Each digital asset kiosk operator shall submit a quarterly
report of the location of each digital asset kiosk located within
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 59

this state within forty-five (45) days of the end of the calendar
quarter. The location report shall include:
1. The company’s legal name;
2. Any fictitious or trade name;
3. The physical address;
4. The start date of operation of the digital asset kiosk at
each location; and
5. The end date of operation of the digital asset kiosk at each
location, if applicable.
D. A digital asset kiosk operator shall disclose in a clear,
conspicuous, and easily readable manner in the chosen language of
the customer all relevant terms and conditions generally associated
with the products, services, and activities of the digital asset
kiosk operator and digital assets.
1. The digital asset kiosk operator shall receive
acknowledgement of receipt of all disclosures required under this
act section through confirmation of consent.
2. The disclosures under this act shall include:
a. a warning, written prominently and in bold type, and
provided separately from the other required
disclosures below, stating: “WARNING: LOSSES DUE TO
FRAUDULENT OR ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS ARE NOT
RECOVERABLE AND TRANSACTIONS IN DIGITAL ASSETS ARE
IRREVERSIBLE. DIGITAL ASSET TRANSACTIONS MAY BE USED
TO STEAL YOUR MONEY BY CRIMINALS IMPERSONATING THE
GOVERNMENT, ORGANIZATIONS, OR YOUR LOVED ONES. THEY
CAN THREATEN JAIL TIME, SAY YOUR IDENTITY HAS BEEN
STOLEN, ALLEGE YOUR COMPUTER HAS BEEN HACKED, INSIST
YOU WITHDRAW MONEY FROM YOUR BANK ACCOUNT TO PURCHASE
DIGITAL ASSETS, OR A NUMBER OF OTHER SCAMS. IF YOU
BELIEVE YOU ARE BEING SCAMMED, CALL YOUR LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.”,
b. the material risks associated with digital assets and
digital asset transactions including, but not limited
to:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 60

(1) a warning that once completed, the transaction
may not be reversed,
(2) the digital asset kiosk operator’s liability for
unauthorized digital asset transactions,
(3) the digital asset customer’s liability for
unauthorized currency transactions,
(4) that digital assets are not legal tender, backed
or insured by the government, and accounts and
value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit
Insurance Corporation, National Credit Union
Administration, or Securities Investor Protection
Corporation protections,
(5) that some digital asset transactions are deemed
to be made when recorded on a public ledger,
which may not be the date or time when the person
initiates the transaction,
(6) that a digital asset’s value may be derived from
market participants’ continued willingness to
exchange currency for digital assets, which may
result in the permanent and total loss of a
particular digital asset’s value if the market
for digital assets disappears,
(7) that a person who accepts a digital asset as
payment today is not required to accept and might
not accept a digital asset in the future,
(8) that the volatility and unpredictability of the
price of digital assets relative to currency may
result in a significant loss over a short period
of time,
(9) that the nature of digital assets means that any
technological difficulties experienced by digital
asset kiosk operators may prevent access to or
use of a person’s digital assets, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 61

(10) that any bond maintained by the digital asset
kiosk operator for the benefit of a person may
not cover all losses a person incurs,
c. the amount of the transaction denominated in United
States dollars as well as the applicable digital
assets,
d. any fees or expenses charged by the digital asset
kiosk operator,
e. any applicable exchange rates,
f. a daily digital asset transaction limit of no more
than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for new
customers,
g. notice of a change in the digital asset kiosk
operator’s rules or policies,
h. the name, address, and telephone number of the owner
of the digital asset kiosk and the days, times, and
means by which a customer can contact the owner for
customer assistance, displayed on or at the location
of the digital asset kiosk, or on the first screen of
the digital asset kiosk,
i. under what circumstances the digital asset kiosk
operator, without a court or government order,
discloses a person’s account information to third
parties, and
j. other disclosures that are customarily given in
connection with a digital asset transaction.
E. Upon each transaction’s completion, the digital asset kiosk
operator shall provide the customer with a receipt, in paper where
possible, in the language chosen by the customer, containing the
following information:
1. The digital asset kiosk operator’s name and contact
information, including a telephone number to answer questions and
register complaints;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 62

2. The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction,
transaction hash, and each applicable digital asset address;
3. All fees charged;
4. The exchange rate of the digital asset to United States
dollars;
5. A statement of the digital asset kiosk operator’s liability
for nondelivery or delayed delivery; and
6. A statement of the digital asset kiosk operator’s refund
policy.
F. In the event that a paper receipt is not possible, the
digital asset kiosk operator shall post in a conspicuous manner
information by which a customer who has engaged in a digital asset
kiosk transaction can contact the digital asset kiosk operator to
obtain a copy of the receipt.
G. All digital asset kiosk operators shall use blockchain
technology to assist in the prevention of sending purchased digital
assets from a digital asset kiosk operator to a digital asset wallet
known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a
transaction. The Banking Department may request evidence from any
digital asset kiosk operator of the current use of blockchain
analytics.
1. All digital asset kiosk operators shall take reasonable
steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and
maintaining a written anti-fraud policy including, but not limited
to:
a. the identification and assessment of fraud-related
risk areas,
b. procedures and controls to protect against identified
risks,
c. allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks, and
d. procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of
the anti-fraud procedures, controls, and monitoring
mechanisms.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 63

2. Each digital asset kiosk operator shall designate and employ
a compliance officer with the following requirements:
a. the individual shall be qualified to coordinate and
monitor compliance with this act section and all other
applicable federal and state laws, rules, and
regulations,
b. the individual shall be employed full-time by the
digital asset kiosk operator,
c. the designated compliance officer cannot shall not be
an individual who owns more than twenty percent (20%)
of the digital asset kiosk by whom the individual is
employed, and
d. the individual shall be responsible for all compliance
responsibilities required under federal and state
laws, rules, and regulations shall be and ensure such
responsibilities are completed by full-time employees
of the digital asset kiosk operator.
3. A digital asset kiosk operator shall issue a refund to a new
customer for the full amount of all fraudulent transactions,
including all transaction fees and charges that were charged to the
customer pursuant to subsection I of this section, made while a new
customer. To receive a refund under this section, a new customer
shall have been fraudulently induced to engage in the digital asset
transactions and shall contact the digital asset kiosk operator and
the Office of the Attorney General to report the fraudulent nature
of the transactions within fourteen (14) days of the last fraudulent
transaction to occur while the customer was a new customer.
4. A digital asset kiosk operator shall issue a refund to an
existing customer who qualifies under this paragraph for the full
amount of all transaction fees and charges that were charged to the
customer pursuant to subsection I of this section upon the request
of the customer. To receive a refund under this paragraph, a
customer shall have been fraudulently induced to engage in a digital
asset transactions transaction and shall contact the digital asset
kiosk operator and the Office of the Attorney General to report the
fraudulent nature of the transaction within fourteen (14) days of
the transaction.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 64

H. A digital asset kiosk operator shall not accept transactions
of more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or the equivalent in
digital assets, in a single day in connection with digital asset
kiosk transactions with a new customer in this state by one or more
digital asset kiosks.
I. The aggregate fees and charges directly or indirectly
charged to a customer related to a single transaction or series of
related transactions involving digital assets effected through a
digital asset kiosk in this state, including any difference between
the price charged to a customer to buy, sell, exchange, swap, or
convert digital assets and the prevailing market value of such
digital assets at the time of such transaction or transactions,
shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the United States dollar
equivalent of the digital assets involved in the transaction or
transactions.
J. All digital asset kiosk operators performing business in
this state shall provide live customer service at a minimum Monday
through Friday from 8:00 a.m. CST to 10:00 p.m. CST. The customer
service toll-free number shall be displayed on the digital asset
kiosk or the digital asset kiosk screens.
K. The Banking Department is authorized to promulgate rules
necessary to implement the provisions of this act section.
SECTION 46. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20N), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act Beginning
July 1, 2026, Class D1 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Public warehouse and/or commodity stock fraud, as provided
for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in
Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-
36 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 65

5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as
provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,
rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section
16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as
provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation
Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft
with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section
259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or
falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the
identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259
of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second
or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,
second or subsequent offense with within ten (10) years, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 66

16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided
for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in
Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for
in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in
Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for
in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to
horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section
208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
27. Forging and/or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 67

30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in
Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in
Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided
for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or
assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided
for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section
1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive
entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as
provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412
of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose
of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of
Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 68

43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Intentionally making a false statement, misrepresentation,
or false certification in a record filed or required to be
maintained under the Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act
or intentionally making a false entry or omitting a material entry
in such a record, as provided for in subsection A of Section 41 of
this act;
48. Knowingly engaging in an activity for which a license is
required under the Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act
without being licensed, as provided for in subsection B of Section
41 of this act;
49. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care
facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title
10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
48. 50. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
49. 51. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
50. 52. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as
provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 69

51. 53. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. 54. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
53. 55. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as
provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
54. 56. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
55. 57. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
56. 58. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as
provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
57. 59. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as
provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
58. 60. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for
in Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
59. 61. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided
for in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
60. 62. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as
provided for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
61. 63. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for
commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of
Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. 64. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for
in Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
63. 65. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411
of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 70

64. 66. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception
or fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
65. 67. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or
enforce the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election
votes, as provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
66. 68. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform
duties, as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
67. 69. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as
provided for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. 70. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as
provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
69. 71. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in
Section 318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. 72. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as
provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
71. 73. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as
provided for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
72. 74. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for
in subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
73. 75. Purchase public supplies from business that employs
family member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
74. 76. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 71

75. 77. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
76. 78. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as
provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
77. 79. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided
for in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
78. 80. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
79. 81. Escape from the Department of Corrections or
alternative incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
80. 82. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided
for in subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
81. 83. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as
provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
82. 84. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section
453 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
83. 85. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in
Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
84. 86. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer,
as provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
85. 87. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than
officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
86. 88. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as
provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 72

87. 89. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
88. 90. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in
Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
89. 91. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
90. 92. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
91. 93. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being
committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
92. 94. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
93. 95. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as
provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
94. 96. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as
provided for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
95. 97. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable
adult, as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
96. 98. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
97. 99. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
98. 100. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
99. 101. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 73

100. 102. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in
Section 884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
101. 103. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section
954 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
102. 104. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in
Section 984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
103. 105. Install communication of gambling information, as
provided for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
104. 106. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided
for in Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
105. 107. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for
in Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
106. 108. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
107. 109. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand
(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
108. 110. Interactive computer service provider failing to
remove child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided
for in Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title;
109. 111. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in
subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
110. 112. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as
provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
111. 113. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in
Section 1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 74

112. 114. Purchasing or receiving dead body, as provided for in
Section 1162 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
113. 115. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in
clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
114. 116. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
115. 117. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in
Section 1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
116. 118. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
117. 119. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
118. 120. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section
1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
119. 121. False statements and acts concerning permits and
waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
120. 122. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
121. 123. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as
provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
122. 124. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as
provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
123. 125. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms
in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
124. 126. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for
in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 75

125. 127. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as
provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
126. 128. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse
receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
127. 129. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of
lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
128. 130. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
129. 131. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
130. 132. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
131. 133. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
132. 134. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in
Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
133. 135. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in
Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
134. 136. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in
Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
135. 137. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
136. 138. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 76

137. 139. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
138. 140. Receive money or property by impersonating another,
value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
139. 141. False use of “State Police” with intent to
communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,
harassed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
140. 142. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
141. 143. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,
valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
142. 144. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
143. 145. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable
paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
144. 146. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as
provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
145. 147. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent
to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) B of Section 1550.28
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
146. 148. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to
complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 77

147. 149. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of
a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
148. 150. Make, sell, or display false identification for
felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
149. 151. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,
as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
150. 152. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
151. 153. Making false entry in records, as provided for in
Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
152. 154. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of
conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
153. 155. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
154. 156. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
155. 157. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
156. 158. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as
provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
157. 159. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided
for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 78

158. 160. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as
provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
159. 161. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
160. 162. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for
in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
161. 163. Forging process of court or title to property, as
provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
162. 164. Making false entries in public book, as provided for
in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
163. 165. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in
Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
164. 166. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section
1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
165. 167. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for
in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
166. 168. Employee making false entries, as provided for in
Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
167. 169. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,
as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
168. 170. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
169. 171. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided
for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
170. 172. Utter signature of another with same name, as
provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 79

171. 173. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided
for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
172. 174. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
173. 175. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as
provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
174. 176. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for
in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
175. 177. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in
Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
176. 178. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in
Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
177. 179. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
178. 180. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
179. 181. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in
Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
180. 182. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value
from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
181. 183. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
182. 184. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 80

183. 185. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for
in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
184. 186. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
185. 187. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,
value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for
in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
186. 188. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in
Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
187. 189. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section
1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
188. 190. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for
in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
189. 191. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,
as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
190. 192. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
191. 193. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
192. 194. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by
fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
193. 195. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for
in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
194. 196. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section
1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 81

195. 197. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use
incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in
Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
196. 198. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as
provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
197. 199. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
198. 200. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or
cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
199. 201. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication
devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
200. 202. Manufacturing five or more unlawful
telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
201. 203. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or
terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
202. 204. Access computer system or network with unlawful
intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
203. 205. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one
hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
204. 206. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in
Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
205. 207. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,
as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 82

206. 208. Rent or sell articles without true name of
manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
207. 209. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as
provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
208. 210. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as
provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
209. 211. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in
Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
210. 212. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as
provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
211. 213. Protective order violation, second or subsequent
offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
212. 214. Protective order violation resulting in physical
injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
213. 215. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for
in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
214. 216. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
215. 217. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in
Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
216. 218. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102
of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
217. 219. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling
place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
218. 220. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 83

219. 221. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided
for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
220. 222. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly
registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
221. 223. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
222. 224. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as
provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
223. 225. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section
16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
224. 226. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for
in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
225. 227. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,
as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
226. 228. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as
provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
227. 229. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as
provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
228. 230. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section
2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
229. 231. Falsely state information to the Department of
Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title
27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
230. 232. Falsify information on permit application for
Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-
10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
231. 233. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as
provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 84

232. 234. Filing false sale with Insurance Commissioner, as
provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
233. 235. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
234. 236. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance
license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
235. 237. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to
deceive Insurance Commissioner, as provided for in subsection E of
Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
236. 238. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,
value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of
Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
237. 239. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided
for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
238. 240. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages
into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
239. 241. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of
Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
240. 242. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
241. 243. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day
or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
242. 244. Disclosing confidential information concerning
violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in
Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 85

243. 245. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for
in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
244. 246. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam
boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
245. 247. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided
for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
246. 248. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
247. 249. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in
Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
248. 250. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123
of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
249. 251. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided
for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
250. 252. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,
as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
251. 253. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation
of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section
11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
252. 254. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
253. 255. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
254. 256. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 86

255. 257. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN
removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
256. 258. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or
counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
257. 259. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
258. 260. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
259. 261. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of
tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
260. 262. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate
of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
261. 263. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver
license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
262. 264. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
263. 265. Interference with traffic control device resulting in
injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
264. 266. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop
shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
265. 267. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
266. 268. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as
provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 87

267. 269. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission
with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section
114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
268. 270. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas
Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
269. 271. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for
in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
270. 272. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section
235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
271. 273. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as
provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
272. 274. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of
Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
273. 275. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value
of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
274. 276. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
275. 277. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
276. 278. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,
value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
277. 279. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided
for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
278. 280. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
279. 281. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 88

280. 282. Giving false information to obtain license, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
281. 283. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in
Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
282. 284. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of
drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
283. 285. False representation in procuring license under the
Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section
353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
284. 286. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for
in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
285. 287. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided
for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
286. 288. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
287. 289. Acting as building inspector without a license, as
provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
288. 290. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in
Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
289. 291. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
290. 292. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,
or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
291. 293. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private
Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
292. 294. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section
115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 89

293. 295. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in
Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
294. 296. False or illegal voucher by public official, as
provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
295. 297. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to
defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
296. 298. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with
intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
297. 299. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,
possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
298. 300. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
299. 301. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without
required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
300. 302. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled
substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
301. 303. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on
controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
302. 304. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required
information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
303. 305. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect
to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section
2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 90

304. 306. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
305. 307. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter
equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
306. 308. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
307. 309. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as
provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
308. 310. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or
obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section
2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
309. 311. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided
for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
310. 312. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel
or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
311. 313. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
312. 314. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with
false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
313. 315. False statement in application for certificate of
title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
314. 316. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,
as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 91

315. 317. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
316. 318. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,
as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
317. 319. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as
provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
318. 320. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
319. 321. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
320. 322. Failure to comply with request for county records, as
provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
321. 323. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
322. 324. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in
Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
323. 325. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without
tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
324. 326. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided
for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
325. 327. Making false oath to report required by Cotton
Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
326. 328. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,
as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
327. 329. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as
provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 92

328. 330. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as
provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
329. 331. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program
Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
330. 332. False application under Former Military Facility
Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
331. 333. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality
Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
332. 334. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment
Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
333. 335. Conflict of interest by a member of the
Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title
69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
334. 336. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma
Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
335. 337. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as
provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
336. 338. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational
Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
337. 339. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,
as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
338. 340. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 93

339. 341. Make takeover offer which is not effective under
Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
340. 342. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in
takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
341. 343. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of
1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
342. 344. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement
Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
343. 345. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority
business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
344. 346. False statement for small business surety bond
guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
345. 347. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided
for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
346. 348. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in
Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
347. 349. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided
for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
348. 350. Business for profit by Water Resources Board member,
as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
349. 351. Conflict of interest by water district official or
employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
350. 352. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness
to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84
of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 94

351. 353. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided
for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D1
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty
percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.
E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98, 108, 212,
213, and 229 of subsection A of this section shall be exempt from
the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B and C of this
section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses provided for in
paragraphs 98, 108, 212, 213, and 229 of subsection A of this
section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding
penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section
51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 95

F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 47. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1268.8, as
amended by Section 129, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1268.8), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1268.8. Any person who knowingly or intentionally uses
a money services business engaged in money transmission, as defined
by the Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act Oklahoma Money
Transmission Modernization Act, or an electronic funds transfer
network for any purpose in violation of the Oklahoma Antiterrorism
Act, or with intent to facilitate any violation of the Oklahoma
Antiterrorism Act shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B4
felony offense punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2) years
nor more than ten (10) years, or by a fine of not more than Fifty
Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or an amount equal to twice the dollar
amount of each transaction, whichever is greater, or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 48. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1b,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1b. A. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics
and Dangerous Drugs Control shall conduct a criminal financial check
on all registration license applications submitted pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1513 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes
Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act. The applicant for a
money services business license shall pay a fee of Fifty Dollars
($50.00) to the Bureau for the criminal financial check prior to
licensing. This shall be in addition to all other administrative
fees imposed by the Oklahoma Banking Department.
B. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control shall have authority to access, review, and investigate any
registration license application and supplier reports other
documentation submitted to the Oklahoma State Banking Commissioner
pursuant to Section 1513 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes the
Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act, for the purposes of
criminal financial checks, identifying or investigating suspicious
or illegal activities or to track illegal drug-related monies. A
copy of all money services transaction reports provided to the
Oklahoma State Banking Commissioner shall be provided to the Bureau.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 96

SECTION 49. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1d,
as amended by Section 278, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-503.1d), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1d. A. No person shall sell, give, transfer,
trade, supply, or provide any money transmitter equipment, as
defined by the Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act, to any
person not licensed by the Oklahoma State Banking Commissioner. Any
person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty upon
conviction of a misdemeanor, for a first offense, and a Class D1
felony offense for any second or subsequent offense. The
misdemeanor penalty shall be a fine not exceeding Three Thousand
Dollars ($3,000.00), or imprisonment in the county jail not to
exceed one (1) year, or both such fine and imprisonment. The Class
D1 felony penalty shall be imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F of Section 20N of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or a fine not exceeding Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),
or both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person who encourages, facilitates, or allows access to
any money transmitter equipment in any manner to facilitate any
violation of Section 2-503.1 of this title shall be guilty of a
Class C2 felony offense, upon conviction, punishable as provided for
in subsections B through F of Section 20M of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 50. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1e,
as amended by Section 279, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (63 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 2-503.1e), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1e. A. Any person who knowingly or intentionally
uses a money services business engaged in money transmission, as
defined by the Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act Oklahoma
Money Transmission Modernization Act, or an electronic funds
transfer network for any purpose in violation of Section 2-503.1 of
this title or Sections 2-503.1a through 2-503.1i of this title, or
with intent to facilitate any violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act or any statute of the United States
relating to controlled substances, or to commit any other crime
shall be guilty, upon conviction, of a Class C2 felony offense and
shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B
through F of Section 20M of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person who, by or through a money services business
engaged in money transmission, as defined in the Oklahoma Financial
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 97

Transaction Reporting Act Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization
Act, or an electronic funds transfer network, knowingly transmits,
exchanges, or processes any securities or negotiable instruments for
any purpose in violation of Section 2-503.1 of this title or
Sections 2-503.1a through 2-503.1i of this title shall be guilty,
upon conviction, of a Class C2 felony offense and shall be punished
by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F of
Section 20M of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 51. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1h,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1h. A. Unless otherwise provided, any person
convicted of violating any of the provisions of this act is guilty
of a Class C2 felony and may shall be punished by imprisonment for
not less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years as provided
for in subsections B through F of Section 20M of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, or by a fine of not more than Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($50,000.00) or an amount equal to twice the dollar amount
of each transaction, whichever is greater, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
B. For the purposes of this act, the terms, “money transmitter
equipment” or a “money transmitter service” shall include an entity
or person engaged in activity in violation of these provisions
regardless of whether the person or entity is licensed to conduct
such activity under the Oklahoma Financial Transaction Reporting Act
Oklahoma Money Transmission Modernization Act.
SECTION 52. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1i,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1i. A. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics
and Dangerous Drugs Control shall have authority to intercept, seize
and forfeit any funds or equipment in violation of any provision of
the Drug Money Laundering and Wire Transmitter Act or in violation
of Section 2-503.1 of this title.
B. A warrant for the seizure of property pursuant to Section
1222 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes may be issued by a
district judge upon finding of probable cause for funds believed to
be used or intended for any violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act to any licensee under the Oklahoma
Financial Transaction Reporting Act Oklahoma Money Transmission
Modernization Act.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 98

C. The State Banking Commissioner or designee upon receipt of
an affidavit of probable cause from an agent of the Bureau, may
issue an emergency notice requiring a temporary freeze on an account
to any financial institution or money services business engaged in
money transmission under its jurisdiction. Such freeze shall halt
all transactions in the account. During the fifteen-day freeze, an
account holder may file an emergency appeal to the district court.
The district court shall schedule a hearing on the emergency appeal
within three (3) judicial days of the request. The provisions of
Section 2201 et seq. of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall not
apply to this section. This freeze shall not exceed fifteen (15)
days and shall automatically expire unless:
1. A subsequent seizure warrant is issued by a district judge;
or
2. A notice of forfeiture is filed on the contents of the
account pursuant to Section 2-503 of this title.
D. No financial institution shall have liability to an account
holder for acting pursuant to this section.
SECTION 53. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1j,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1j. A. Any licensee of a money transmission,
transmitter, or wire transmitter business pursuant to the Oklahoma
Financial Transaction Reporting Act licensed under the Oklahoma
Money Transmission Modernization Act and their delegates shall
collect a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each transaction not in
excess of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and in addition to such fee
an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the amount in excess of Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00).
B. The fee prescribed by subsection A of this section shall be
remitted quarterly to the Oklahoma Tax Commission on such forms as
the Commission, with the assistance of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, may prescribe for such
purpose. All required forms and remittances shall be filed with the
Tax Commission not later than the fifteenth day of the month
following the close of each calendar quarter.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 99

C. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall apportion all revenues
derived from the fee to the Drug Money Laundering and Wire
Transmitter Revolving Fund.
D. Every licensee and their delegates shall post a notice on a
form prescribed by the Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control that notifies customers that
upon filing an individual income tax return with either a valid
social security number or a valid taxpayer identification number the
customer shall be entitled to an income tax credit equal to the
amount of the fee paid by the customer for the transaction.
E. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be afforded all provisions
currently under law to enforce the provisions of subsection B of
this section. If a licensee fails to file reports or fails to remit
the fee authorized by subsection B of this section, the Oklahoma Tax
Commission shall have the authority pursuant to Section 212 of Title
68 of the Oklahoma Statutes to suspend the license of the licensee
and its delegates. A notification of the suspension shall also be
sent to the State Banking Commissioner and the Director of the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control. The
licensee and its delegates may not reapply for a license until all
required reports have been filed and all required fee amounts have
been remitted.
F. Upon request from the Oklahoma Tax Commission, the State
Banking Commissioner may make a claim against the surety bond of the
licensee on behalf of the State of Oklahoma.
G. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control and its attorneys may assist the Oklahoma Tax Commission in
conducting audits and the prosecution and/or seeking of legal
remedies to ensure compliance with this act.
SECTION 54. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 2-503.1l,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2-503.1l. As used in the Drug Money Laundering and Wire
Transmitter Act:
1. “Conducts” includes initiating, concluding, or participating
in initiating, or concluding a transaction;
2. “Digital assets” means the same as defined in Section 1359
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 100

3. “Digital asset kiosk” means an electronic terminal acting as
a mechanical agent of the digital asset kiosk operator to enable the
digital asset kiosk operator to facilitate the exchange of digital
assets for money, bank credit, or other digital asset including, but
not limited to:
a. connecting directly to a separate digital asset
exchange that performs the actual digital asset
transmission, or
b. drawing upon the digital asset in the possession of
the electronic terminal’s operator;
4. “Digital asset kiosk operator” means a person or entity that
owns, operates, or manages a digital asset kiosk located in this
state offering digital asset kiosk transactions;
5. “Financial institution” includes:
a. any financial institution, as defined in Section
5312(a)(2) of Title 31 of the United States Code, or
the regulations promulgated thereunder, and
b. any foreign bank, as defined in Section 3101 of Title
12 of the United States Code;
3. 6. “Financial transaction” means:
a. a transaction which in any way or degree affects
state, interstate or foreign commerce:
(1) involving the movement of funds by wire or other
means,
(2) involving one or more monetary instruments, or
(3) involving the transfer of title to any real
property, vehicle, vessel, or aircraft; or
b. a transaction involving the use of a financial
institution which is engaged in, or the activities of
which affect, state, interstate or foreign commerce
in any way or degree;
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 101

4. 7. “Knowing that the property involved in a financial
transaction represents the proceeds of some form of unlawful
activity” means that the person knew the property involved in the
transaction represented proceeds from some form, though not
necessarily which form, of any violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act;
5. 8. “Monetary instruments” means:
a. coin or currency of the United States or of any other
country, travelers’ checks, personal checks, bank
checks, and money orders, or
b. investment securities or negotiable instruments, in
bearer form or otherwise in such form that title
thereto passes upon delivery;
6. 9. “Money transmitting” includes transferring funds by any
and all means including, but not limited to, transfers within this
state, country or to locations abroad by wire, check, draft,
facsimile, or courier;
10. “Money transmitter equipment” means any type of terminal,
machine, computer software, access to any network, or any other type
of tangible or intangible apparatus or system, or any combination
thereof, that may be used by a money transmitter to initiate a
transmittal of currency or digital assets;
7. 11. “Proceeds” means all things of value furnished, or
intended to be furnished, in exchange for a controlled dangerous
substance in violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act, including all proceeds traceable to such an
exchange, and all monies, negotiable instruments, and securities
used, or intended to be used to facilitate any violation of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act;
8. 12. “Specified unlawful activity” means any violation of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act; and
9. 13. “Transaction” includes a purchase, sale, loan, pledge,
gift, transfer, delivery, or other disposition, and with respect to
a financial institution includes a deposit, withdrawal, transfer
between accounts, exchange of currency, loan, extension of credit,
purchase or sale of any stock, bond, certificate of deposit, or
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 102

other monetary instrument, use of a safe deposit box, or any other
payment, transfer, or delivery by, through, or to a financial
institution, by whatever means effected.
SECTION 55. REPEALER 6 O.S. 2021, Sections 1511, 1512,
1513, 1514, and 1515, are hereby repealed.
SECTION 56. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 103

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 4th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3521 Page 104